Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.290

Claims and liabilities, enforcement against organization—Personal liabilities of officials, employees, etc.

Obligations incurred by any administrator or board or employee or agent thereof pertaining to their performance or nonperformance or misperformance of any matters or things authorized, required or permitted them by this chapter or any marketing agreement or order issued pursuant to this chapter, and any other liabilities or claims against them or any of them shall be enforced in the same manner as if the whole organization under such marketing agreement or order were a corporation. No liability for the debts or actions of such administrator, board, employee, or agent incurred in their official capacity under the agreement or order shall exist either against its administrator, board, officers, employees, and/or agents in his or her or their individual capacity, nor against the state of Washington or any subdivision or instrumentality thereof nor against any other organization, administrator or board (or employee or agent thereof) established pursuant to this chapter or the assets thereof. The administrator of any order or agreement, the members of any such board, and also his or her or their agents and employees, shall not be held responsible individually in any way whatsoever to any person for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent, person, or employee, except for their own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. No such person or employee shall be held responsible individually for any act or omission of any other administrator, board, member of any such board, or other person. The liability of the members of any such board shall be several and not joint and no member shall be liable for the default of any other member.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6076; 1961 c 256 s 29.]